Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3198.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; NORTHWEST METRO REGIONAL REAL TIME CRIME CENTER.new text end new text begin (a) $2,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of public safety for a grant to the city of Brooklyn Park to fund the joint Northwest Metro Regional Real Time Crime Center on behalf of participating jurisdictions. The base for this appropriation is $....... in fiscal year 2028 and thereafter. new text end new text begin (b) The Real Time Crime Center (RTCC) is established in the northwest metropolitan area to enhance public safety, improve coordination between law enforcement agencies, provide regional community intervention staff to address crime trends that cross jurisdictional lines, and enable rapid response to criminal activity through real-time data analysis and leveraged technology in the cities of Brooklyn Center, Brooklyn Park, Crystal, Golden Valley, New Hope, and Robbinsdale. The RTCC must operate as a centralized facility equipped with technology and staffed by law enforcement personnel and analysts to monitor, collect, analyze, and disseminate real-time data to assist in the prevention and investigation of criminal activity. new text end new text begin (c) An advisory board must provide oversight and guidance to the RTCC. The board must consist of the following 12 members: new text end new text begin (1) one representative from the police department in each of the cities of Brooklyn Center, Brooklyn Park, Crystal, Golden Valley, New Hope, and Robbinsdale; and new text end new text begin (2) the mayor of each of the cities of Brooklyn Center, Brooklyn Park, Crystal, Golden Valley, New Hope, and Robbinsdale. new text end new text begin (d) The board must meet at least quarterly and submit a biennial report to the governor and chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over public safety by September 1 of each odd-numbered year beginning in 2027. The report must describe the progress and accomplishments made by RTCC in the prevention and investigation of criminal activity during the preceding two years. new text end